Utah statutes.
26-38-6.   Local ordinances.

(1)  This chapter supersedes any ordinance enacted by the governing body of a political subdivision that restricts smoking in a place of public access as defined in Section 26-38-2 and that is not essentially identical to the provisions of this chapter.

(2)  This chapter does not supersede an ordinance enacted by the governing  body of a political subdivision that restricts smoking in outdoor places of public access which are owned or operated by:

(a)  a political subdivision as defined in Section 17B-1-102;

(b)  a state institution of higher education; or

(c)  a state institution of public education.

